Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201460-6,291
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of sections 60-6,288 to 60-6,290
or who drives, moves, causes, or knowingly permits to be moved on any highway
any vehicle or vehicles which exceed the limitations as to width, length,
or height as provided in such sections for which a penalty is not elsewhere
provided shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1933, c. 105, § 8, p. 431;

Laws 1941, c. 76, § 1, p. 312;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1037;

R.S.1943, § 39-725;

Laws 1949, c. 115, § 1, p. 309;

Laws 1953, c. 134, § 6, p. 421;

Laws 1955, c. 151, § 2, p. 449;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-725;

Laws 1974, LB 593, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 35;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,188;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 387;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 207;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 81;

Laws 2011, LB164, § 3.

Omission of reference to section on speed did not preclude general penalty. Hyslop v. State, 159 Neb. 802, 68 N.W.2d 698 (1955).

In addition to punishment under this section, driver's license may be suspended. Kroger v. State, 158 Neb. 73, 62 N.W.2d 312 (1954).